Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.68, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Materials used in providing certain taxable services. (a) Materials stored, used, or consumed in providing a taxable service listed in section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (6), intended to be sold ultimately at retail are exempt. (b) This exemption includes, but is not limited to: (1) chemicals, lubricants, packaging materials, seeds, trees, fertilizers, and herbicides, if these items are used or consumed in providing the taxable service; (2) chemicals used to treat waste generated as a result of providing the taxable service; (3) accessory tools, equipment, and other items that are separate detachable units used in providing the service and that have an ordinary useful life of less than 12 months; and (4) fuel, electricity, gas, and steam used or consumed in the production process, except that electricity, gas, or steam used for space heating, cooling, or lighting is exempt if (i) it is in excess of average climate control or lighting, and (ii) it is necessary to produce that particular service. (c) This exemption does not include machinery, equipment, implements, tools, accessories, appliances, contrivances, furniture, and fixtures used in providing the taxable service. new text begin (d) This exemption does not apply to any accessory tools, equipment, and other items that are separate detachable units that have an ordinary useful life of less than 12 months that are used in providing landscaping, gardening, or lawn care services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.68, subdivision 40, is amended to read: Subd. 40. Land clearing. Tree, bush, shrub, and stump removal are exempt when sold to contractors or subcontractors as part of a land clearing contract. For purposes of this subdivision, "land clearing contract" means a contract for the removal of trees, bushes, and shrubs, including the removal of roots and stumps, to developnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a sitedeleted text begin . This exemption does not apply to land clearing ofdeleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) new text end a portion of a site to allow for remodeling, improvement, or expansion of an existing structure. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end